Hawaii statutes.
§249-12 Standard size license plates.
Notwithstanding sections 249-1 to 249-11 each county director of finance may
issue standard size license plates in connection with the first registration of
a motor vehicle subsequent to September 1, 1956, charging therefor the
costs provided in section 249-7 in the case of original registration, and the
director of finance of the city and county of Honolulu shall make the necessary
contractual arrangements so that the issuance of standard size license plates
may be accomplished. [L 1955, JR 23, §§1, 2; RL 1955, §130-11.5; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §9; HRS §249-12; am L 1982, c 237, §4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next